Missouri, session 2026, SB1594.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Missouri, as follows:
1
Section A. Chapter 442, RSMo, is amended by adding thereto
2
fifteen new sections, to be known as sections 442.800, 442.802,
3
442.805, 442.808, 442.815, 442.818, 442.821, 442.824, 442.827,
4
442.830, 442.833, 442.836, 442.839, 442.842, and 442.845, to
5
read as follows:
1
442.800. 1. Sections 442.800 to 442.845 shall be
2
known and may be c ited as the "Contract for Deed Act".
3
2. As used in sections 442.800 to 442.845, the
4
followi n g terms mean:
5
(1) "Contract for deed", both a long term contract for
6
deed and a short term contract for deed;
7
(2) "Default", the failure to:
8
(a) Make a timely payment; or
9
(b) Comply with a term of a contract for deed;
10
(3) "Long term contract for deed", an executory
11
contract for conveyance of real property, other than a newly
12
constructed residence not theretofore occupied, that is used
13
or to be used as a purchaser's residence or as the residence
14
of a person related to the purchaser within the second
15
degree of consanguinity or affinity, that includes an option

SB 1594 2
16
to purchase the property if the term of the contract and any
17
extension thereof is more than three years;
18
(4) "Short term contract for deed", an executory
19
contract for conveyance of real property, other than a newly
20
constructed residence not theretofore occupied, that is used
21
or to be used as a purchaser's residence or as the residence
22
of a person related to the purchaser within the second
23
degree of consanguinity or affinity, that includes an option
24
to purchase the property if the term of the contract and any
25
extension thereof is three years or less.
1
442.802. 1. Sections 442.800 to 442.845 shall not
2
apply to:
3
(1) An executory contract that provides for the
4
delivery of a deed from the seller to the purchaser within
5
one hundred eighty days of the date of the final execution
6
of the executory contract; or
7
(2) Any transaction involving the conveyance of real
8
property where the seller is a bank licensed under Missouri
9
law.
10
2. For purposes of sections 442.800 to 442.845, a
11
disclos u re required by such sections that is made by a
12
seller's agent shall be deemed a disclosure made by the
13
seller.
1
442.805. 1. A contract for deed shall not be
2
enforceable u n les s the contract is in writing and signed by
3
the party to be bound or by that party's authorized
4
representative.
5
2. The rights and obligations of the parties to a
6
contrac t for deed shall be determined solely from the
7
written contract, and any prior oral agreements between the
8
parties shall be superseded by the contract.

SB 1594 3
9
3. A contract for deed shall not be varied by any oral
10
agreeme n ts or discussions that occur before or
11
contemporaneously with the execution of the contract.
12
4. The seller shall include in a separate document or
13
in a pr o vision of a contract for deed a statement printed in
14
fourteen-point bold-faced type or fourteen-point uppercase
15
typewritten letters that reads substantially similar to the
16
following:
17
THIS EXECUTORY CONTRACT REPRESENTS THE FINAL
18
AGREEMENT BETWEEN THE SELLER AND PURCHASER AND MAY
19
NOT BE CONTRADICTED BY EVIDENCE OF PRIOR,
20
CONTEMPORANEOUS, OR SUBSEQUENT ORAL AGREEMENTS OF
21
THE PARTIES. THERE ARE NO UNWRITTEN ORAL
22
AGREEMENTS BETWEEN THE PARTIES.
23
________ ________________________
24
(Date) (Signature of Seller)
25
________ ________________________
26
(Date) (Signature of Purchaser)
27
5. Not less than ten days before a contract for deed
28
is sign e d by the purchaser, the seller shall provide to the
29
purchaser a written statement that specifies:
30
(1) The purchase price of the property;
31
(2) The interest rate charged under the contract;
32
(3) The total amount of principal and interest, which
33
shall be reasonably estimated if the interest rate is
34
variable, to be paid under the contract;
35
(4) The late charge, if any, that may be assessed
36
under th e contract;

SB 1594 4
37
(5) The interest rate upon default, if any, charged
38
under th e contract; and
39
(6) The fact that the seller shall not charge a
40
prepayme n t penalty or any similar fee if the purchaser
41
elects to pay the entire amount due under the contract
42
before the scheduled payment date under the contract.
43
6. A potential seller shall not execute a contract for
44
deed wi t h a potential purchaser if the seller does not own
45
the property in fee simple free from any liens or other
46
encumbrances not previously disclosed in writing to the
47
purchaser in accordance with subsection 1 of this section.
48
7. Except as provided by subsection 6 of this section,
49
a selle r , or the seller's heirs or assigns, shall maintain
50
fee simple title free from any liens or other encumbrances
51
to property covered by a contract for deed for the entire
52
duration of the contract. This subsection shall not apply
53
to a lien or encumbrance p laced on the property that is:
54
(1) Placed on the property because of the conduct of
55
the purc h aser;
56
(2) Agreed to by the purchaser as a condition of a
57
loan obt a ined to place improvements on the property,
58
including utility or fire protection improvements; or
59
(3) Placed on the property by the seller prior to the
60
executio n of the contract in exchange for a loan used only
61
to purchase or repair the property, or subsequently placed
62
on the property by the seller in exchange for a loan to
63
refinance such prior loan, if:
64
(a) The seller, not later than the third day before
65
the date the contract is executed, notifies the purchaser in
66
a separate written disclosure:
67
a. Of the name, address, and phone number of the
68
lienhol d er or, if applicable, servicer of the loan;

SB 1594 5
69
b. Of the loan number and outstanding balance of the
70
loan;
71
c. Of the monthly payments due on the loan and the due
72
date of those payments;
73
d. In fourteen-point type that, if the seller fails to
74
make ti m ely payments to the lienholder, the lienholder may
75
attempt to collect the debt by foreclosing on the lien and
76
selling the property at a foreclosure sale; and
77
e. Of seller's consent to allow purchaser to receive
78
communi c ations from the lienholder about the loan secured by
79
the lien;
80
(b) The lien:
81
a. I s attached only to the property sold to the
82
purchas e r under the contract;
83
b. Secures indebtedness that, at no time, is or will
84
be grea t er in amount than the amount of the total
85
outstanding balance owed by the purchaser under the
86
executory contract; and
87
c. Secures indebtedness that by its terms is scheduled
88
to be f u lly repaid on a date before the date on which the
89
purchaser's installment payments on the executory contract
90
are scheduled to be fully paid;
91
(c) The lienholder:
92
a. D oes not prohibit the property from being
93
encumbe r ed by an executory contract;
94
b. Agrees in the lien instrument or other recorded
95
instrum e nt to give written notice to purchaser of any
96
indebtedness default; and
97
c. Consents to verify the status of the loan on
98
request of the purchaser and to accept payments directly
99
from the purchaser if the seller defaults on the
100
indebtedness; and

SB 1594 6
101
(d) The following covenants are placed in the
102
executor y contract:
103
a. A covenant that obligates the seller to make timely
104
payment s on the loan and to give monthly statements to the
105
purchaser reflecting the amount paid to the lienholder, and
106
the information described by paragraph (a) of this
107
subdivision;
108
b. A covenant that obligates the seller, not later
109
than th e third day after the seller receives or has actual
110
knowledge of a document or an event described by this
111
subparagraph, to notify the purchaser in writing in fourteen-
112
point type that the seller has been sent a notice of
113
default, notice of acceleration, or notice of foreclosure or
114
has been sued in connection with a lien on the property and
115
to attach a copy of all related documents received to the
116
written notice; and
117
c. A covenant that warrants that if the seller does
118
not mak e timely payments on the loan or any other
119
indebtedness secured by the property, the purchaser may,
120
without notice, cure any deficiency with a lienholder
121
directly and deduct from the total outstanding balance owed
122
by the purchaser under the executory contract, without the
123
necessity of judicial action, one hundred fifty percent of
124
any amount paid to the lienholder.
125
8. A violation of subsections 4, 6, or 7 of this
126
section or section 442.833:
127
(1) Is an unlawful practice within the meaning of
128
sections 407.020 and 407.025 and is actionable in a public
129
or private suit brought under such sections; and
130
(2) In addition to other rights or remedies provided
131
by law, e ntitles the purchaser to cancel and rescind a
132
contract for deed and receive from the seller:

SB 1594 7
133
(a) The return of all payments of any kind made to the
134
seller u n der the contract; and
135
(b) Reimbursement for:
136
a. A ny payments the purchaser made to a taxing
137
authori t y for the property; and
138
b. The value of any improvements made to the property
139
by the p urchaser.
140
9. The provisions of subsection 8 of this section
141
shall n o t limit or effect any other rights or remedies a
142
purchaser has under any other law.
143
10. A seller is not liable under this section if:
144
(1) A lien is placed on the property by a person other
145
than the seller; and
146
(2) Not later than the thirtieth day after the date
147
the sell e r receives notice of the lien, the seller takes all
148
steps necessary to remove the lien and has the lien removed
149
from the property.
1
442.808. 1. Before a long term contract for deed is
2
signed by the pur c haser, the seller shall provide the
3
purchaser with:
4
(1) A statement of the amount, if any, of delinquent
5
real pro p erty taxes or assessments due and owing on the
6
property subject to the contract; and
7
(2) A legible copy of any insurance policy, binder, or
8
other ev i dence relating to the property that indicates:
9
(a) The name of the insurer and the insured;
10
(b) A description of the property insured; and
11
(c) The amount for which the property is insured.
12
2. N ot less than ten days before a long term contract
13
for dee d is signed by the purchaser, the seller shall
14
provide the purchaser with:

SB 1594 8
15
(1) A legible copy of the recorded instrument
16
demonstr a ting the seller owns the property, and any document
17
that describes an encumbrance or other claim, including a
18
restrictive covenant or easement, that affects title to the
19
real property; and
20
(2) A written notice, which shall be attached to the
21
contract proposed for execution, informing the purchaser of
22
the condition of the property that shall, at a minimum, be
23
completed by the seller, and executed by the seller and
24
purchaser and read substantially similar to the following:
25
WARNING: IF ANY OF THE ITEMS BELOW HAVE NOT
26
BEEN CHECKED, YOU MAY NOT BE ABLE TO LIVE ON THE
27
PROPERTY. BEFORE SIGNING A CONTRACT, YOU HAVE
28
THE RIGHT TO INSPECT THE PROPERTY INSIDE AND OUT.
29
SELLER'S DISCLOSURE NOTICE CONCERNING THE
30
PROPERTY AT __________ (insert street address or
31
legal description and city)
32
THIS DOCUMENT STATES CERTAIN APPLICABLE FACTS
33
ABOUT THE PROPERTY YOU ARE CONSIDERING
34
PURCHASING. CHECK ALL THE ITEMS THAT ARE
35
APPLICABLE OR TRUE:
36
_____ The property is in a recorded
37
subdivision.
38
_____ The property has water service that has
39
been approved by the appropriate municipal,
40
county, or state agency and that provides potable
41
water.
42
_____ The property has operable public sewer
43
service.
44
_____ The property has an operable, private
45
septic system sewer which has been approved by
46
the appropriate municipal, county, or state
47
agency for installation of a septic system.

SB 1594 9
48
_____ The property has electric service.
49
_____ The property has operable gas or propane
50
service.
51
_____ The property is not in a one hundred year
52
floodplain.
53
_____ The roads to the boundaries of the property
54
are paved and maintained by:
55
_____ The seller;
56
_____ The owner of the property on which the road
57
exists;
58
_____ The municipality;
59
_____ The county; or
60
_____ The state.
61
_____ No individual or entity other than the
62
seller:
63
Owns the property;
64
Has a claim of ownership to the property; or
65
Has an interest in the property.
66
_____ No individual or entity has a lien filed
67
against the property.
68
_____ There are no restrictive covenants,
69
easements, or other title exceptions or
70
encumbrances that prohibit construction of a
71
house on the property.
72
NOTICE: SELLER ADVISES PURCHASER TO:
73
(1) OBTAIN A TITLE ABSTRACT OR TITLE
74
COMMITMENT COVERING THE PROPERTY AND HAVE THE

SB 1594 10
75
ABSTRACT OR COMMITMENT REVIEWED BY AN ATTORNEY
76
BEFORE SIGNING A CONTRACT OF THIS TYPE; AND
77
(2) PURCHASE AN OWNER'S POLICY OF TITLE
78
INSURANCE COVERING THE PROPERTY.
79
________ ________________________
80
(Date) (Signature of Seller)
81
________ ________________________
82
(Date) (Signature of Purchaser)
83
3. If the property is not located in a recorded
84
subdivi s ion, the seller shall provide the purchaser with a
85
separate disclosure form stating that utilities may not be
86
available to the property until the subdivision is recorded
87
as required by law.
88
4. If the seller advertises property for sale under a
89
long te r m contract for deed, the advertisement shall
90
disclose information regarding the availability of water,
91
sewer, and electric service.
1
442.815. 1. A seller shall not include as a term of a
2
contract for d eed a provision that:
3
(1) Imposes a late payment fee that exceeds five
4
percent o f the monthly payment under the contract;
5
(2) Imposes a prepayment penalty or any similar fee if
6
the purc h aser elects to pay the entire amount due under the
7
contract before the scheduled payment date under the
8
contract; or
9
(3) Forfeits that portion of an option fee or other
10
option p a yment exceeding one thousand five hundred dollars
11
paid under the contract for a late payment.

SB 1594 11
12
2. A provision of a contract for deed that purports to
13
waive a right or exempt a party from a liability or duty
14
pursuant to sections 442.800 to 442.845 shall be void.
15
3. Subdivision (2) of subsection 1 of this section
16
shall n o t apply to a short term contract for deed.
1
442.818. 1. In addition to other rights or remedies
2
provided by l a w, t he purchaser may cancel and rescind a long
3
term contract for deed for any reason by sending by
4
certified or registered mail, return receipt requested, or
5
by delivering in person a signed, written notice of
6
cancellation to the seller not later than the fourteenth day
7
after the date the purchaser signs the contract.
8
2. If the purchaser cancels a long term contract for
9
deed as provided by subsection 1 of this section, the seller
10
shall, not later than the tenth day after the date the
11
seller receives the purchaser's notice of cancellation:
12
(1) Return to the purchaser the executed contract and
13
any prop e rty exchanged or payments made by the purchaser
14
under the contract; and
15
(2) Cancel and release any security interest arising
16
out of t h e contract.
17
3. The seller shall include in immediate proximity to
18
the spa c e reserved in a long term contract for deed for the
19
purchaser's signature a statement printed in fourteen-point
20
bold-faced type or fourteen-point uppercase typewritten
21
letters that reads substantially similar to the following:
22
YOU, THE PURCHASER, MAY CANCEL THIS CONTRACT
23
AT ANY TIME DURING THE NEXT TWO WEEKS. THE
24
DEADLINE FOR CANCELING THE CONTRACT IS __________
25
(insert date). THE ATTACHED NOTICE OF CANCELLATION
26
EXPLAINS THIS RIGHT.

SB 1594 12
27
4. The seller shall provide a notice of cancellation
28
form to the purchaser at the time the purchaser signs a long
29
term contract for deed that is printed in fourteen-point
30
bold-faced type or fourteen-point uppercase typewritten
31
letters and that reads substantially similar to the
32
following:
33
(date of contract)
34
NOTICE OF CANCELLATION
35
YOU MAY CANCEL THE CONTRACT FOR ANY REASON WITHOUT
36
ANY PENALTY OR OBLIGATION BY ________ (insert
37
date).
38
(1) YOU MUST SEND BY CERTIFIED OR REGISTERED
39
MAIL, RETURN RECEIPT REQUESTED, OR DELIVER IN
40
PERSON A SIGNED AND DATED COPY OF THIS CANCELLATION
41
NOTICE OR ANY OTHER WRITTEN NOTICE TO
42
________________ (Name of Seller) AT
43
________________ (Seller's Address) BY ________
44
(insert date).
45
(2) THE SELLER SHALL, NOT LATER THAN THE
46
TENTH DAY AFTER THE DATE THE SELLER RECEIVES YOUR
47
CANCELLATION NOTICE:
48
(a) RETURN THE EXECUTED CONTRACT AND ANY
49
PROPERTY EXCHANGED OR PAYMENTS MADE BY YOU UNDER
50
THE CONTRACT; AND
51
(b) CANCEL AND RELEASE ANY SECURITY INTEREST
52
ARISING OUT OF THE CONTRACT.
53
I ACKNOWLEDGE RECEIPT OF THIS NOTICE OF
54
CANCELLATION FORM.
55
________ ________________________
56
(Date) (Signature of Purchaser)

SB 1594 13
57
I HEREBY CANCEL THIS CONTRACT
58
________ ________________________
59
(Date) (Signature of Purchaser)
60
5. The seller shall not request the purchaser to sign
61
a waive r of receipt of the notice of cancellation form
62
required by this section.
63
6. In addition to other rights or remedies provided by
64
law, th e purchaser may cancel and rescind a long term
65
contract for deed at any time if the purchaser learns that
66
the property that is covered by the contract is not properly
67
subdivided, split, or platted in accordance with state and
68
local law, and the seller has failed to correct the
69
deficiency within six months of receiving written notice
70
from buyer. A purchaser cancelling and rescinding a
71
contract und er this subsection shall:
72
(1) Deliver a signed, written notice of the
73
cancella t ion and rescission to the seller in person; or
74
(2) Send a signed, written notice of the cancellation
75
and resc i ssion to the seller by certified or registered
76
mail, return receipt requested.
77
7. If a purchaser cancels a contract as provided under
78
subsect i on 6 of this section, the seller, not later than the
79
tenth day after the date the seller receives the notice of
80
cancellation and rescission, shall:
81
(1) Deliver in person or send by certified or
82
register e d mail, return receipt requested, to the purchaser
83
a signed, written notice that the seller intends to
84
subdivide or plat the property properly; or

SB 1594 14
85
(2) Return to the purchaser all payments of any kind
86
made to t he seller under the contract and reimburse the
87
purchaser for:
88
(a) Any payments the purchaser made to a taxing
89
authorit y for the property; and
90
(b) The value of any improvements made to the property
91
by the p u rchaser.
92
8. A purchaser shall not exercise the purchaser's
93
right t o cancel and rescind a long term contract for deed
94
pursuant to subsection 6 of this section if, on or before
95
the ninetieth day after the date the purchaser receives the
96
seller's notice pursuant to section 442.824, the seller:
97
(1) Properly subdivides or plats the property; and
98
(2) Delivers in person or sends by certified or
99
register e d mail, return receipt requested, to the purchaser
100
a signed, written notice evidencing that the property has
101
been subdivided or platted in accordance with state and
102
local law.
103
9. The seller shall not terminate the purchaser's
104
possess i on of the property covered by a long term contract
105
for deed being cancelled and rescinded before the seller
106
pays the purchaser any money to which the purchaser is
107
entitled.
1
442.821. 1. Except as provided by subsection 2 of
2
this section, the seller shall record a long term contract
3
for deed, including the attached disclosure statement
4
required by subdivision (2) of subsection 5 of section
5
442.805, in the land records of the county in which the
6
property is located on or before the thirtieth day after the
7
date the contract is executed.
8
2. If a long term contract for deed is terminated for
9
any rea s on, the seller shall record an instrument that

SB 1594 15
10
releases and terminates the contract, accompanied by an
11
affidavit executed by the seller certifying the termination
12
occurred in compliance with the terms of the contract,
13
including, if applicable, certification of delivery of a
14
written default and termination notice from seller to
15
purchaser, and that the property is not occupied by the
16
purchaser.
1
442.824. 1. A seller may enforce the remedy of
2
rescission or of f orfeiture and acceleration against a
3
purchaser in default under a contract for deed only if:
4
(1) The seller notifies, in the manner described in
5
subsecti o n 2 of this section, the purchaser of:
6
(a) The seller's intent to enforce a remedy under this
7
section; and
8
(b) The purchaser's right to cure the default within
9
the thir t y-day period described by subsection 3 of this
10
section;
11
(2) The purchaser fails to cure the default within the
12
thirty-d a y period described by subsection 3 of this section;
13
and
14
(3) Section 442.827 does not apply.
15
2. ( 1) Notice shall be in writing and shall be
16
deliver e d by registered or certified mail, return receipt
17
requested. The notice shall be conspicuous and printed in
18
fourteen-po int bold-faced type or fourteen-point uppercase
19
typewritten letters, and shall include on a separate page
20
the following statement:
21
NOTICE
22
YOU ARE NOT COMPLYING WITH THE TERMS OF THE
23
CONTRACT TO BUY YOUR PROPERTY. UNLESS YOU TAKE THE
24
ACTION SPECIFIED IN THIS NOTICE BY ________ (insert

SB 1594 16
25
date), THE SELLER HAS THE RIGHT TO TAKE POSSESSION
26
OF YOUR PROPERTY.
27
(2) In addition to the requirements of subdivision (1)
28
of this s ubsection, the notice shall:
29
(a) Identify and explain the remedy the seller intends
30
to enfor c e;
31
(b) If the purchaser has failed to make a timely
32
payment, specify:
33
a. The delinquent amount, itemized into principal and
34
interes t ;
35
b. Any additional charges claimed, such as late
36
charges or attorney's fees; and
37
c. The period to which the delinquency and additional
38
charges relate; and
39
(c) If the purchaser has failed to comply with a term
40
of the c o ntract, identify the term violated and the action
41
required to cure the violation.
42
(3) Notice by mail is given when it is mailed to the
43
purchase r 's residence or place of business. The affidavit
44
of a person knowledgeable of the facts to t h e effect that
45
notice was given is prima facie evidence of notice in an
46
action involving a subsequent bona fide purchaser for value
47
if the purchaser is not in possession of the real property
48
and if the stated time to avoid the forfeiture has expired.
49
A bona fide subsequent purchaser for value who relies upon
50
the affidavit under this subsection shall take title free
51
and clear of the contract.
52
3. Notwithstanding an agreement to the contrary, a
53
purchas e r in default under a contract for deed may avoid the
54
enforcement of a remedy described by subsection 1 of this
55
section by complying with the terms of the contract on or

SB 1594 17
56
before the thirtieth day after the date notice is given
57
under that subsection.
1
442.827. 1. If a purchaser defaults after the
2
purchaser has pai d thirty percent or more of the amount due
3
or the equivalent of forty-eight monthly payments under a
4
long term contract for deed:
5
(1) The seller shall be granted the power to sell,
6
through a trustee designated by the seller, the purchaser's
7
interest in the property:
8
(a) As provided by this section; or
9
(b) As provided under the procedures specified in
10
sections 443.190 to 443.270;
11
(2) The seller shall not enforce the remedy of
12
rescissi o n or of forfeiture and acceleration; and
13
(3) The seller may exercise the power granted under
14
subdivis i on (1) of this subsection after first notifying the
15
purchaser of a default under the contract and allowing the
16
purchaser at least thirty days after the date notice is
17
given to cure the default. The notice shall be provided as
18
prescribed by subsection 2 of section 442.824 except that
19
the notice specified in subsection 2 of section 442.824
20
shall be replaced by the following statement:
21
NOTICE
22
YOU ARE NOT COMPLYING WITH THE TERMS OF THE
23
CONTRACT TO BUY YOUR PROPERTY. UNLESS YOU TAKE
24
THE ACTION SPECIFIED IN THIS NOTICE BY ________
25
(insert date), A TRUSTEE DESIGNATED BY THE SELLER
26
HAS THE RIGHT TO SELL YOUR PROPERTY AT A PUBLIC
27
AUCTION.
28
2. The trustee or a substitute trustee designated by
29
the sel l er under subdivision (1) of subsection 1 of this

SB 1594 18
30
section shall publish and serve a notice of sale as
31
prescribed by sections 443.310, 443.320, and 443.325. A
32
notice of sale shall not be valid unless it is given a fter
33
the period to cure has expired.
34
3. The trustee or a substitute trustee designated by
35
the sel l er shall conduct the sale as prescribed by section
36
443.327. The seller shall:
37
(1) Convey to a purchaser at a sale conducted under
38
this sec t ion fee simple title to the real property; and
39
(2) Warrant that the property is free from any
40
encumbra n ce.
41
4. The remaining balance of the amount due under a
42
long te r m contract for deed shall be the debt for purposes
43
of a sale under this section. If the net proceeds of the
44
sale exceed the debt amount, t he seller shall disburse the
45
excess funds to the purchaser under the contract. If the
46
proceeds of the sale are insufficient to extingui s h the debt
47
amount, the seller's right to recover the resulting
48
deficiency shall be subject to sections 443.230 and 443.240
49
unless a provision of the contract releases the purchaser
50
under the contract from liability.
51
5. The affidavit of a person knowledgeable of the
52
facts t h at states that the notice was given and the sale was
53
conducted as provided by this section shall be prima facie
54
evidence of those facts. A purchaser for value who relies
55
on an affidavit under thi s subsection shall acquire title to
56
the property free and clear of a long term contract for deed.
57
6. Notwithstanding any terms of a contract to the
58
contrar y , the placement of a lien for the reasonable value
59
of improvements to residential real estate for purposes of
60
providing utility service to the property shall not

SB 1594 19
61
constitute a default under the terms of a long term contract
62
for deed for the purchase of the real property.
1
442.830. 1. The seller shall provide the purchaser
2
with an annua l st a tement in January of each year for the
3
term of a long term contract for deed. If the seller mails
4
the statement to the purchaser, the st a tement shall be
5
postmarked not later than January thirty-first.
6
2. The statement required by subsection 1 of this
7
section shall include the seller's good faith understanding
8
of the following information:
9
(1) The amount paid under the contract;
10
(2) The remaining amount owed under the contract;
11
(3) The number of payments remaining under the
12
contract ;
13
(4) The amounts paid to taxing authorities on the
14
purchase r 's behalf if collected by the seller;
15
(5) The amounts paid to insure the property on the
16
purchase r 's behalf if collected by the seller;
17
(6) If the property has been damaged and the seller
18
has rece i ved insurance proceeds, an accounting of the
19
proceeds applied to the property; and
20
(7) If the seller has changed insurance coverage, a
21
legible c opy of the current policy, binder, or other
22
evidence that satisfies the requirements of subdivision (2)
23
of subsection 1 of section 442.808.
24
3. A seller who conducts less than two transactions in
25
a twelv e -month period under this section who fails to comply
26
with subsection 1 of this section shall be liable to the
27
purchaser for:
28
(1) Liquidated damages in the amount of one hundred
29
dollars f or each annual statement the seller fails to

SB 1594 20
30
provide to the purchaser within the time required by
31
subsection 1 of this section; and
32
(2) Reasonable attorney's fees.
33
4. A seller who conducts two or more transactions in a
34
twelve- m onth period under this section who fails to comply
35
with subsection 1 of this section shall be liable to the
36
purchaser for:
37
(1) Liquidated damages in the amount of two hundred
38
fifty do l lars a day for each day after January thirty-first
39
that the seller fails to provide the purchaser with the
40
statement, but not to exceed the fair market value of the
41
property; and
42
(2) Reasonable attorney's fees.
1
442 . 833. 1. The named insured under an insurance
2
policy, binde r , o r other coverage relating to property
3
subject to a long term contract for deed shall inform the
4
insurer, not later than the tenth day after the date the
5
coverage is obtained or the contract executed, whichever is
6
later, of:
7
(1) The long term contract for deed and the term of
8
the cont r act; and
9
(2) The name and address of the other party to the
10
contract .
11
2. An insurer who disburses proceeds under an
12
insuran c e policy, binder, or other coverage relating to
13
property that has been damaged shall issue the proceeds
14
jointly to the purchaser and the seller designated in a long
15
term contract for deed, and to any lender secured by any
16
deed of trust affecting the property if such deed of trust
17
so requires.
18
3. If proceeds under an insurance policy, binder, or
19
other c o verage are disbursed, the purchaser and seller shall

SB 1594 21
20
ensure that the proceeds are used to repair, remedy, or
21
improve the condition on the property.
22
4. Notwithstanding the provisions of this section to
23
the con t rary, and unless any existing deed of trust
24
affecting the property states otherwise, if the insurer
25
determines repair is not feasible, the insurance proceeds
26
shall first be used to satisfy any remaining amounts due
27
under the deed of trust and promissory note which it secures
28
and shall then be used to satisfy any remaining amounts due
29
under a long term contract for deed. Any remaining balance
30
shall be paid to the purchaser.
1
442.836. 1. The seller shall transfer recorded, legal
2
title of the p rop e rty covered by a long term contract for
3
deed to the purchaser not later than the thirtieth day after
4
the date the seller receives the purchaser's final payment
5
due under the contract.
6
2. Unless a court finds good cause for noncompliance,
7
a selle r who violates subsection 1 of this section shall be
8
liable to the purchaser for:
9
(1) Liquidated damages in the amount of:
10
(a) Two hundred fifty dollars a day for each day the
11
seller f a ils to transfer the title to the purchaser during
12
the period that begins the thirty-first day and ends the
13
ninetieth day after the date the seller receives the
14
purchaser's final payment due under the contract; and
15
(b) Five hundred dollars a day for each day the seller
16
fails to transfer title to the purchaser after the ninetieth
17
day after the date the seller receives the purchaser's final
18
payment due under the contract; and
19
(2) Reasonable attorney's fees.
20
3. I f a person to whom a seller's property interest
21
passes b y will or intestate succession is required to obtain

SB 1594 22
22
a court order to clarify the person's status as an heir or
23
to clarify the status of the seller of the property before
24
the person may convey good and indefeasible title to the
25
property, the court in which the action is pending may waive
26
payment of the liquidated damages and attorney's fees under
27
subsection 2 of this section if the court finds that the
28
person is pursuing the action to establish good and
29
indefeasible title with reasonable diligence.
30
4. As used in this section, the term "seller" includes
31
a succe s sor, assignee, personal representative, executor, or
32
administrator of the seller.
33
5. As used in this section, the phrase "good cause for
34
noncomp l iance" includes the failure of the seller, if the
35
seller is an heir to the original seller, to have received
36
from the original seller or any other person notice of the
37
requirements of a long term contract for deed.
1
442.839. 1. A purchaser, at any time after paying
2
fifteen perce n t o f the principal purchase price and without
3
paying penalties or charges of any kind, shall be entitled
4
to convert the purchaser's interest in property under a long
5
term contract for deed into recorded, legal title in
6
accordance with this section.
7
2. If the purchaser tenders to the seller an amount of
8
money e q ual to the balance of the total amount owed by the
9
purchaser to the seller under a long term contract for deed,
10
the seller shall transfer to the purchaser recorded, legal
11
title of the property covered by the contract.
12
3. Subject to subsection 4 of this section, if the
13
purchas e r delivers to the seller of property covered by a
14
long term contract for deed a promissory note that is equal
15
in amount to the balance of the total amount owed by the
16
purchaser to the seller under the contract and that contains

SB 1594 23
17
the same interest rate, due dates, and late fees as the
18
contract:
19
(1) The seller shall execute a deed containing any
20
warranti e s required by the contract and conveying to the
21
purchaser recorded, legal title of the property; and
22
(2) The purchaser shall simultaneously execute a deed
23
of trust that:
24
(a) Contains the same terms as the contract regarding
25
the purc h aser's and seller's duties concerning the property;
26
(b) Secures the purchaser's payment and performance
27
under th e promissory note and deed of trust; and
28
(c) Conveys the property to the trustee, in trust, and
29
confers o n the trustee the power to sell the property if the
30
purchaser defaults on the promissory note or the terms of
31
the deed of trust.
32
4. On or before the tenth day after the date the
33
seller r eceives a promissory note under subsection 3 of this
34
section that substantially complies with that subsection,
35
the seller shall:
36
(1) Deliver to the purchaser a written explanation
37
that leg a lly justifies why the seller refuses to convert the
38
purchaser's interest into recorded, legal title under
39
subsection 3 of this section; or
40
(2) Communicate with the purchaser to schedule a
41
mutually agreeable day and time to execute the deed and deed
42
of trust under subsection 3 of this section.
43
5. A seller who violates this section is liable to the
44
purchas e r in the same manner and amount as a seller who
45
violates section 442.836 is liable to a purchaser. This
46
subsection shall not limit or affect any other rig h ts or
47
remedies a purchaser has under other law.

SB 1594 24
48
6. On the last date that all of the conveyances
49
describ e d by subsections 2 and 3 of this section are
50
executed, a long term contract for deed:
51
(1) Shall be considered completed; and
52
(2) Shall have no further effect.
1
442 . 842. 1. A purchaser under a long term contract
2
for deed, on w rit t en request, shall be entitled to receive
3
the following information from the seller:
4
(1) As of the date of the request or another date
5
specifie d by the purchaser, the amount owed by the purchaser
6
under the contract; and
7
(2) If applicable, the name and address of the
8
seller's desired trustee for a deed of trust to be executed
9
under section 442.839.
10
2. On or before the tenth day after the date the
11
seller r eceives from the purchaser a written request for
12
information described by subsection 1 of this section, the
13
seller shall provide to the purchaser a written statement of
14
the requested information.
15
3. If the seller does not timely respond to a request
16
made un d er this section, the purchaser may:
17
(1) Determine or pay the amount owed under the
18
contract , including determining the amount necessary for a
19
promissory note under section 442.839; and
20
(2) If applicable, select a trustee for a deed of
21
trust un d er section 442.839. The seller may replace the
22
trustee with a trustee of sel ler's choice at any time.
23
4. For purposes of subdivision (2) of subsection 3 of
24
this se c tion, a purchaser shall select a trustee that lives
25
or has a place of business in the same county where the
26
property covered by the contract is located.

SB 1594 25
27
5. Not later than the twentieth day after the date a
28
seller r eceives notice of an amount determined by a
29
purchaser under subdivision (1) of subsection 3 of this
30
section, the seller may contest that amount by sending a
31
written objection to the purchaser. An objection under this
32
subsection shall:
33
(1) Be sent to the purchaser by regular and certified
34
mail;
35
(2) Include the amount the seller claims is the amount
36
owed und e r the contract; and
37
(3) Be based on written records kept by the seller or
38
the sell e r's agent that were maintained and regularly
39
updated for the entire term of the contract.
1
442.845. If a seller is liable to a purchaser under
2
sections 442. 8 00 to 442.845, the purchaser, without taking
3
judicial action, may deduct the amount owed to the purchaser
4
by the seller from any amounts owed to the seller by the
5
purchaser under the terms of a long term contract for deed.
